New York, session 2025-2026, A8805.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Robert 4 Bornt. The bridge located on state route two, designated as bridge 5 number 1000250, which crosses over state route twenty-two in the town of 6 Petersburg, county of Rensselaer, shall be dedicated to Robert Bornt. 7 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 8 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 9 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 10 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Robert Bornt". However, to 11 avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the 12 dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one 13 of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge shall not be 14 changed as a result of this act. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13334-09-6